Idaho, session 2025, S1112.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 31-4401A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4401A. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:
(1) "Flow control" means any method or system under which a governmen-
tal entity, by ordinance, regulation, or other official directive, compels
solid waste haulers to process or dispose of waste at a designated facility.
(1) (2) "Major solid waste generator" means any person who generates
two per cent percent (2%) or more of the total solid waste originating in any
county.
(2) (3) "Person" means any natural person, firm, corporation, or other
entity, but does not include a municipality, a state agency, or a state edu-
cational institution.
(3) (4) "Significant effect" means any change in the amount of solid
waste to be sent to any waste disposal site which that exceeds either five per
cent percent (5%) of the total monthly amount of waste disposal at any par-
ticular solid waste disposal site during the most recent calendar year, or
five per cent percent (5%) of the projected processing capacity of any new
solid waste disposal site.
(4) (5) "State agency" means each state board, commission, department,
or officer authorized by law to make rules or to determine contested cases.
(5) (6) "State educational institution" means a public educational fa-
cility or institution regulated by the state board of education or the board
of regents of the university of Idaho.
(6) (7) "System" means lands, sites, facilities, equipment and man-
power necessary for collection, transportation, storage, treatment,


processing, reuse, recycling, or other means necessary for the disposal of
solid waste.
(7) (8) "Waste processing facility" means any waste disposal site or
any public work at which solid waste is compacted, incinerated, or otherwise
treated prior to disposal. It shall not include the placement of portable
collection facilities or similar equipment used solely to facilitate col-
lection of solid waste.
SECTION 2. That Section 31-4402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4402. AUTHORITY OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS. The board of county com-
missioners in each of the several counties is hereby authorized to acquire,
establish, maintain, and operate such solid waste disposal systems as are
necessary and to provide reasonable and convenient access to such disposal
systems by all the citizens of the county. For the purpose of establishing
systems for solid waste disposal, the board of county commissioners may
purchase, lease, condemn, or receive as gifts such areas as are suitable,
or the board may exchange land with any other unit or units of government
under such terms as are mutually advantageous. In order that a county may
acquire sites or systems as expeditiously and advantageously as possible,
a county may use funds from current revenues, may use funds made available
through the issuance of bonds, or may use funds made available from county
building construction funds, and the provisions of chapter 10, title 31,
Idaho Code, are hereby made applicable for the acquisition of solid waste
disposal systems and a. A solid waste disposal system is declared to be a
public building within the definition of chapter 10, title 31, Idaho Code,
except that notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no board of county
commissioners or other public authority shall be required to contract out
the establishment, acquisition, operation or maintenance of a solid waste
disposal system, but if it should elect to do so, it may waive the giving of
a bond or other security in connection with such contract upon such terms
and conditions as it deems appropriate, and provided further that any county
may itself, without contracting out to any other party, establish, acquire,
operate and maintain a solid waste disposal system. Provided that no board
of county commissioners, solid waste district board, or any other public
authority shall use compulsory means, including flow control, to limit the
private sector from competing.
SECTION 3. That Section 31-4403, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4403. OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE. (1) It shall be the duty of the
board of county commissioners in each of the several counties to acquire
sites or facilities, and to maintain and operate solid waste disposal sys-
tems. Such maintenance and operation may, by exclusive or nonexclusive
means, be performed through or by:
(1) (a) Employees, facilities, equipment, and supplies hired by or ac-
quired by the board of county commissioners;
(2) (b) Contracts, franchises, or otherwise, entered into by the board
to have the maintenance and operation performed by private persons;


(3) (c) Contracts entered into by the board to have the maintenance and
operation performed by another unit of government;
(4) (d) Contracts, franchises, or otherwise, granted pursuant to law by
the board, for all or any part or parts of the county; or
(5) (e) Any combination of subsections (1), (2), (3) and (4) of this
section; paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection.
(6) (2)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
in order to provide for the public health, safety, and well-being, the
board of county commissioners and/or another unit of state government,
may shall determine whether solid waste disposal systems services are
to be provided by means of a contract, franchise, or otherwise, provided
for under subsection (2) (1)(b) of this section, or any contract, fran-
chise, or otherwise, awarded under subsection (4) (1)(d) of this sec-
tion, with or without compulsory competitive bidding; through competi-
tive bidding or a request for proposals.
(7) (b) The board of county commissioners, before entering into such
contracts, franchises, or otherwise, may require such security for the
performance thereof as it deems appropriate or may waive such undertak-
ing.
SECTION 4. That Section 31-4407, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4407. EXISTING AND FUTURE MUNICIPAL FACILITIES TO CONFORM TO
CHAPTER. Solid waste disposal facilities now in existence or hereafter es-
tablished and maintained and/or operated by any city shall conform in the
same manner as county solid waste disposal facilities as provided in section
sections 34-4402 and 31-4405, Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 31-4407A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4407A. CHANGES IN STATUS OF MAJOR WASTE GENERATORS AND MUNICIPALI-
TIES -- PROCEDURES. (1) Major solid waste generators and municipalities op-
erating solid waste collection or disposal systems pursuant to the authority
conferred by law or desiring to initiate or abandon such systems shall con-
form to the procedures and standards set forth in this section before tak-
ing any action which that would significantly affect the amount or distri-
bution of solid waste within any county. The board of county commissioners
of any county may waive operation of the procedure called for in this section
by passage of a resolution indicating their its intent to do so. Provided
that no board of county commissioners, solid waste district board, or any
other public authority shall use compulsory means, including flow control,
to limit the private sector from competing.
(2) Whenever a county shall propose proposes the establishment of a new
solid waste processing facility within the boundaries of the county or in
conjunction with adjoining counties, it shall give notice to the public and
all municipalities within its boundaries that it intends to establish a pro-
cessing facility. In conjunction with the notice, the county shall provide
a copy of a feasibility study prepared by a licensed professional engineer
concerning the proposed processing facility which that shall address the es-


timated capital cost of the facility, the estimated costs of operation of the
facility, and the estimated life span of the facility. The notice shall be
provided to potentially affected municipalities at least one hundred eighty
(180) days prior to the scheduled initiation of construction of any solid
waste processing facility.
(3) Within ninety (90) days of receipt of the notice, each affected mu-
nicipality shall respond to the notice provided by the county, indicating in
its response the intention of the municipality to participate in the use of
the proposed facility or to develop or continue operation of an independent
solid waste processing facility of its own for the projected duration of the
proposed county project.
(4) Pursuant to the responses received from affected municipalities,
the county proposing development of the solid waste processing facility may
tender contracts to participating municipalities assuring the availabil-
ity of waste disposal capacity at the proposed facility for any duration
promised by contract and securing commitments from the municipalities to
participate in use of the facility for the duration of its projected life.
The contracts shall not constitute guarantees of costs or duration of ser-
viceability of the proposed facility. The contracts may provide for annual
adjustments to reflect changes in the relative contribution rates of mu-
nicipalities to the waste stream feeding the disposal facility. No capital
contribution obligation shall extend beyond fifteen (15) years. Additional
contracts for capital participation may be proposed and entered into after
the expiration of the initial agreement.
(5) Any municipality which that indicates its intent not to participate
in a proposed facility shall be barred from later participation without the
consent of the board of county commissioners and without payment of a capital
contribution adequate to finance the cost of additional capacity adequate to
accommodate the waste stream generated within the municipality. The amount
and method of payment of the capital contribution shall be established by the
board of county commissioners.
(6) Any municipality which that elects to participate in a given solid
waste processing facility, but later elects to withdraw from said project,
may do so, but shall remain obligated for any capital costs incurred in its
behalf, but may receive partial credit for operational economies created by
its withdrawal. The burden of proof of the extent of operational economies
shall rest upon the withdrawing municipality.
(7) Major solid waste generators located outside participating munic-
ipalities shall be treated in the same manner as municipalities concerning
commitments to waste facility capacity. Boards of county commissioners are
authorized to enter into contracts with major solid waste generators for the
expected duration of operation of any solid waste processing facility.
SECTION 6. That Section 31-4902, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4902. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Act" or "this act" means this regional solid waste or domestic sep-
tage district act.
(2) "Commissioners" means the board of commissioners of each county
within a district.


(3) "District" means a regional solid waste or domestic septage dis-
trict created pursuant to this chapter.
(4) "District board" means the board of directors of a district.
(5) "Domestic septage" means either liquid or solid material removed
from a septic tank, cesspool, portable toilet, type III marine sanitation
device, or similar treatment works that receive only domestic sewage. Do-
mestic septage does not include liquid or solid material removed from septic
tanks, cesspools, or similar treatment works that receive either commercial
wastewater or industrial wastewater and does not include grease removed from
a grease trap at a restaurant.
(6) "Facility" or "facilities" means all equipment and other property,
including electrical cogeneration equipment, deemed necessary by the dis-
trict board for the operation of a solid waste disposal and/or resource re-
covery system or the operation of domestic septage receiving stations, do-
mestic septage treatment processes and domestic septage disposal methods.
(7) "Flow control" means any method or system under which a governmen-
tal entity, by ordinance, regulation, or other official directive, compels
solid waste haulers to process or dispose of waste at a designated facility.
(7) (8) "Participating county" means a county which that elects,
through action of the commissioners as provided in this chapter, to become a
member of a district.
(8) (9) "Solid waste" means any garbage, refuse, sludge from a waste
treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control fa-
cility and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semi-solid,
or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, min-
ing, and agricultural operations, and from community activities, but does
not include solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage, or solid or dis-
solved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges that
are point sources subject to permits under 33 U.S.C. 1342, or source, special
nuclear, or byproduct material as defined by the atomic energy act of 1954,
as amended.
(9) (10) "State" means the state of Idaho.
(10) (11) "System" means all components of solid waste operations,
including, but not limited to, landfill compliance measures, landfill dis-
posal operations, regional transfer operations, domestic septage receiving
stations, domestic septage disposal methods, domestic septage treatment
operations and resource recovery and management, on any site or sites ac-
quired, constructed, operated, or managed by a district.
SECTION 7. That Section 31-4906, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4906. POWERS OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS. A district board shall have
and may exercise the following powers and duties:
(1) To sue and be sued;
(2) To develop and administer a system for the regional disposal of
solid waste, domestic septage and/or resource recovery within the district;
(3) To authorize any action by motion, resolution, or other official
action;
(4) To administer and enforce all solid waste or domestic septage regu-
lations and standards of the district;


(5) To determine the location of its main office and branch offices, if
any;
(6) To acquire, hold title to, lease, mortgage or encumber, dispose of,
and pledge real and personal property and to acquire, construct, or lease
buildings, structures, and solid waste or domestic septage disposal and re-
source recovery sites and equipment as may be deemed necessary to fulfill its
duties, and to have and exercise the power of eminent domain therefor;
(7) To sell, convey, lease or dispose of any property, real or personal,
with or without competitive bid, upon such terms and conditions and for such
consideration as the district board deems appropriate;
(8) To acquire, construct, operate, and maintain any facilities within
the district, and to enter into contracts and agreements, cooperative and
otherwise, affecting the affairs of the district, including contracts with
the United States of America and any of its agencies or instrumentalities,
the state and any of its agencies or instrumentalities, any corporation or
person, public or private, any municipality, and any political or governmen-
tal subdivision, within or without the state, and to cooperate with any one
(1) or more of them in acquiring, constructing, operating, or maintaining a
system or facilities within the district; provided, however, that no board
of county commissioners, solid waste district board, or any other public au-
thority, shall use compulsory means, including flow control, to limit the
private sector from competing;
(9) To acquire, maintain, and operate, as an incident to solid waste
disposal or domestic septage, electrical cogeneration facilities, to sell
electricity to any person or entity, and to enter into contracts therefor;
(10) To receive moneys and property from participating counties and to
receive gifts, grants, and donations from any person or entity, to expend the
same for the purposes of the district, to pledge the same for the payment of
any indebtedness, to deposit moneys in accordance with the public depository
laws of the state, and to invest moneys of the district in investments per-
mitted under sections 67-1210 and 67-1210A, Idaho Code;
(11) To borrow money and incur indebtedness, and to evidence the same by
notes, warrants, bonds, or other evidence of indebtedness;
(12) To have the management, control, and supervision of all the busi-
ness and affairs of the district;
(13) To hire an administrator and provide for the compensation of other
employees of the district, and to retain agents, engineers and consultants;
(14) To retain or employ regular legal counsel, and to retain such spe-
cial legal counsel as may be deemed necessary;
(15) To fix and to increase or decrease rates, fees, tolls, or charges
for the use or availability of the facilities of the district;
(16) To adopt rules, regulations, and standards, consistent with state
and federal laws and regulations, for the use of the district's system and
facilities;
(17) To maintain civil actions for the abatement of any violation of any
of the district's rules, regulations, or standards;
(18) To insure its property and to enter into contracts for insurance,
including, but not limited to, liability insurance;


(19) To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers set forth
in this chapter, and to do all things necessary or incidental to the proper
operation of this chapter.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.